Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.030

Educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs—Powers and duties of student achievement council.

In administering educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under this chapter, the student achievement council shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) Select persons to receive conditional scholarships or loan repayments;

(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(3) Publicize the programs in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington professional educator standards board;

(4) Collect and manage repayments from participants who do not meet their service obligations under this chapter; and

(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the programs.

[ 2019 c 295 s 212; 2012 c 229 s 563; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 177; 2004 c 58 s 3; 1987 c 437 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 295: "(1) By amending the financial assistance programs under this chapter, the legislature intends to: (a) Provide assistance to a broad range of educators including, though not exclusively to, certificated teachers; (b) attract and retain potential educators, especially to meet areas of educator shortage; (c) streamline the administration of the programs; and (d) make the use of state appropriations more flexible.

(2) The legislature intends for the student achievement council to balance the number, the amount, and the type of awards distributed. When selecting participants and defining the awards, the student achievement council shall consult with stakeholders to: (a) Consider the purpose of each financial assistance program; (b) recognize the total cost of attendance to complete an educator preparation program; and (c) consider the needs of the education system, including the need for educators in shortage areas." [ 2019 c 295 s 210.]

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.